Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201081-885.05
Railroads; public utilities; applicability of act.

The Nebraska
Real Estate License Act shall not apply to railroads and other
public utilities regulated by the State of Nebraska, or their subsidiaries
or affiliated corporations, or to the officers or regular employees thereof,
unless performance of any of the acts described in subdivision (2) of section
81-885.01 is in connection with the sale, purchase, lease, or other disposition
of real estate or investment therein unrelated to the principal business activity
of such railroad or other public utility or affiliated or subsidiary corporation
thereof.

Laws 1973, LB 68, § 5;

Laws 1983, LB 182, § 5;

Laws 2009, LB30, § 3.